Montana, session 2025, HB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Auction or lottery of antelope license. (1) The commission may issue one either sex
antelope license each year through a competitive auction or lottery. The commission shall promulgate rules for
the use of the license and conduct of the auction or lottery. A wildlife conservation organization that focuses on
the conservation of antelope may be authorized to conduct the license auction or lottery, in which case the
authorized organization may retain up to 10% of the proceeds of the sale to cover reasonable auction or lottery
expenses.
(2) All proceeds remaining from the auction or lottery, whether conducted by the commission or as
otherwise authorized by the commission, must be used by the department for the substantial benefit of
antelope. The proceeds from the auction or lottery must be used in addition to any other funds that the
department uses for the management of antelope.
Section 2. Auction or lottery of swan license. (1) The commission may issue one swan license
each year through a competitive auction or lottery. The commission shall promulgate rules for the use of the
license and conduct of the auction or lottery. A wildlife conservation organization that focuses on the
conservation of migratory game birds may be authorized to conduct the license auction or lottery, in which case
the authorized organization may retain up to 10% of the proceeds of the sale to cover reasonable auction or
lottery expenses.
(2) All proceeds remaining from the auction or lottery, whether conducted by the commission or as
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 330
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 330
otherwise authorized by the commission, must be used by the department for the substantial benefit of
migratory game birds. The proceeds from the auction or lottery must be used in addition to any other funds that
the department uses for the management of migratory game birds.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified as an integral
part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 8, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 8, apply to [sections 1 and 2].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 330
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 330, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 330
INTRODUCED BY J. HINKLE, T. RUNNING WOLF
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO AUCTION AND LOTTERY LICENSES; CREATING AUCTION OR
LOTTERY LICENSES FOR ANTELOPE AND SWANS; DESIGNATING PROCEEDS FROM LICENSE SALES;
AND PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY.